Louisiana, session 2026, SB262.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:1368 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 19-A. TRANSFER ON DEATH ACCOUNTS
§1368. Exemption of proceeds from probate; transfer on death accounts
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the following
terms as used in this Section shall be defined as follows:
(1) "Transfer on death account" means any deposit or brokerage
account maintained by a financial institution on behalf of an owner where the
owner designates by contract, in accordance with this Section, a named
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-474 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 262
beneficiary to receive funds or assets held in the account upon the death of the
owner.
(2) "Financial institution" means any state or federally-chartered bank,
credit union, mutual association, or registered and licensed investment
management company. The commissioner of financial institutions is authorized
to promulgate rules and regulations to determine whether an entity qualifies as
a financial institution under this Chapter.
(3) "Owner" means the individual account holder of a transfer on death
account.
(4) "Beneficiary" means the named beneficiary of a transfer on death
account designated by the owner in the transfer on death account agreement
between the owner and the financial institution provided that such designation
is made in accordance with Subsection D of this Section.
B. The lawful beneficiary designated in the owner's transfer on death
account agreement to receive account funds or assets in the event of the owner's
death, including the owner's estate, shall be entitled to the proceeds and avails
of the transfer on death account against the representatives of the owner or the
person effecting the transfer on death account, or the estate of either, and
against the heirs and legatees of either person.
C. The provisions of Subsections A and B of this Section shall apply
regardless of whether any of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The right to change the beneficiary is reserved or permitted in the
transfer on death account agreement between the owner and the financial
institution.
(2) The transfer on death account agreement between the owner and the
financial institution is made payable to the owner, his estate, or to the estate of
a beneficiary if the beneficiary predeceases the person.
(3) The owner designates a beneficiary in a last will and testament.
(4) The transfer on death account agreement between the financial
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-474 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 262
institution and the owner provides terms and conditions for disposition of
proceeds in the event the beneficiary predeceases the owner.
D.(1) The provisions of Subsection B of this Section shall not apply unless
the financial institution requires an owner to designate or change the
beneficiary of a transfer on death account in the following manner:
(a) The designation of beneficiary or change of beneficiary form shall be
executed by authentic act by the owner at an office of the financial institution.
A designation of beneficiary form or change of beneficiary form submitted by
the owner to the financial institution electronically shall be void and without
effect.
(b) The designation of beneficiary or change of beneficiary form shall not
be executed on behalf of an owner by a representative of the owner under the
authority of a power of attorney or other representative agreement.
(c) For transfer on death accounts with more than one owner, the
designation of beneficiary or change of beneficiary form shall be executed in the
manner provided herein by all owners of the account.
(2) The procedures described in this Subsection are considered minimum
standards and shall not be interpreted to prohibit a financial institution from
establishing additional terms and conditions under which it will handle transfer
on death account designation of beneficiary. However, any additional terms and
conditions imposed on transfer on death accounts shall be void and without
effect to the extent the terms and conditions conflict with this Section.
(3) The financial institution and the beneficiary, or the representatives
and heirs of either, shall not be held liable and are discharged from all claims
to the funds or assets held in the transfer on death account by the estate,
surviving spouse, heirs, legatees or forced heirs of a deceased owner if it
transfers the funds or assets of the account to the named beneficiary, provided
that the beneficiary is named by the owner in accordance with this Subsection.
(4) The provisions of this Section shall not be construed or interpreted
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-474 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 262
to prohibit any claim by the owner's estate or his heirs and legatees to assert a
vice of the owner's consent in executing a designation of beneficiary or change
of beneficiary form. The financial institution shall be entitled to assert a vice of
consent claim provided that the designation or change is made in accordance
with this Section.
E. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a debt secured by the
owner's pledge or assignment of the funds or assets held in the transfer on death
account.
Section 2. R.S. 6:314, 653.1, 766.1 and R.S. 9:1711.1 through 1711.9 are hereby
repealed.